Utah statutes.
35A-8-501.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board" means the Housing Board created by this part.

(2)  "Fund" means the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund created by this part.

(3)  "Rural" means a county in the state other than Utah, Salt Lake, Davis, or Weber.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

